Arkansas, session 2025, HB1369.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-6-203(a)(1)(A), concerning campaign
contribution limitations and resulting from Initiated Act 1 of 1990 and
Initiated Act 1 of 1996, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1)(A) It shall be unlawful for any candidate for any public office
or for any person acting on the candidate's behalf to accept campaign
contributions in excess of the maximum campaign contribution level limit
established by rule of the Arkansas Ethics Commission under subsection (i) of
this section per election from:
(i) An individual;
(ii) A political party that meets the definition of a
political party under § 7-1-101;
(iii) A political party that meets the requirements
*MBM125*
03-03-2025 13:50:58 MBM125

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/3/25 HB1369
of § 7-7-205;
(iv) A county political party committee;
(v) A legislative caucus committee; or
(vi) An approved political action committee.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 7-6-203(b)(1)(A), concerning campaign
contribution limitations and resulting from Initiated Act 1 of 1990 and
Initiated Act 1 of 1996, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1)(A) It shall be unlawful for any person to make a contribution
to a candidate for any public office or to any person acting on the
candidate's behalf, which in the aggregate amount exceeds the maximum
campaign contribution limit established by rule of the Arkansas Ethics
Commission per election.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 7-6-203(i), concerning the establishment of
the maximum campaign contribution limit, is amended to read as follows:
(i)(1) The Arkansas Ethics Commission shall establish the maximum
campaign contribution limit by rule as follows:
(1)(A) The adjusted maximum campaign contribution limit
shall be calculated from a base amount of two thousand dollars ($2,000) as of
January 1, 2015;
(2)(B)(i) The contribution limits maximum campaign
contribution limit shall be adjusted at the beginning of each odd-numbered
year in an amount equal to the percentage certified to the Federal Election
Commission by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics United States
Secretary of Labor under 52 U.S.C. § 30116(c) as existing on January 1, 2015:
2025.
(ii) The adjustment under subdivision (i)(1)(B)(i)
of this section shall occur as soon as practicable following the
certification to the Federal Election Commission by the United States
Secretary of Labor, but no later than the later of:
(a) Thirty (30) days following the
certification; or
(b) The next regularly scheduled meeting of
the Arkansas Ethics Commission.
(3)(C) If the amount of the maximum campaign contribution
03-03-2025 13:50:58 MBM125

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/3/25 HB1369
limit after adjustment under subdivision (i)(2)(i)(1)(B) of this section is
not a multiple of one hundred dollars ($100), the Arkansas Ethics Commission
shall round the amount to the nearest multiple of one hundred dollars ($100);
and.
(4)(2)(A) The Arkansas Ethics Commission shall promulgate rules
identifying the adjusted contribution limit under this subsection:
(i) Publish the maximum campaign contribution limit
established under subdivision (i)(1) of this section on the official website
of the Arkansas Ethics Commission and in any other location or format deemed
necessary by the Arkansas Ethics Commission; and
(ii) Make the maximum campaign contribution limit
established under subdivision (i)(1) of this section available to the
Secretary of State, elected public officials, candidates, committees under
this subchapter, and the public.
(B) The maximum campaign contribution limit established under
subdivision (i)(1) of this section shall be:
(i) Effective upon being published upon the official
website of the Arkansas Ethics Commission; and
(ii) Retroactive to the date of the certification to
the Federal Election Commission by the United States Secretary of Labor under
subdivision (i)(1)(B)(i) of this section.
(C) The maximum campaign contribution limit established under
subdivision (i)(1) of this section:
(i) Is not a rule under §§ 10-3-309 and 25-15-202;
and
(ii) Shall not be promulgated under the Arkansas
Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 10-3-309(b)(1)(B), concerning the review
and approval of state agency rules, is amended to add an additional
subdivision to read as follows:
(vi) An adjustment to the maximum campaign
contribution limit under § 7-6-203(i).

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 25-15-202(9)(B), concerning the definition
of "rule" in the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, is amended to add an
03-03-2025 13:50:58 MBM125

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/3/25 HB1369
additional subdivision to read as follows:
(ix) An adjustment to the maximum campaign
contribution limit under § 7-6-203(i).

SECTION 6. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that standardizing the laws related
to campaign finance contributes significantly to the public peace, health,
and safety of the citizens of the State of Arkansas; that the public peace,
health, and safety is negatively affected by unclear campaign finance laws
which lead to unintentional violations of the law and inhibit the ability of
citizens to exercise their right to political expression; that this act
preserves the public peace, health, and safety by ensuring that political
donors, political candidates, and elected officials are free from unintended
limits of their political expression by providing a more efficient and
transparent manner of establishing the state's maximum campaign contribution
limit; and that this act also preserves the public peace, health, and safety
by eliminating unnecessary rulemaking processes, thereby avoiding the use of
public funds in that rulemaking that can be allocated to other pressing needs
of the state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act
being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health,
and safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/Ray







03-03-2025 13:50:58 MBM125